Utah statutes.
59-18-111.   Duties of trustee of trust subject to supervision by specified charitable organization.

The trustee of a trust subject to the supervision by a specified public charitable organization or organizations, as provided in Subsection 59-18-109(5), shall file with each specified charitable organization:

(1)  a trust copy of the governing instrument together with a written report, under oath, setting forth complete information as to the nature of the assets and liabilities with the delivery of the release pursuant to Subsection 59-18-109(4) or the filing of the election under Section 59-18-110;

(2)  an annual report, within 4-1/2 months following the close of each year, setting forth a complete statement of receipts, disbursements, assets (together with cost and market value of each asset), and liabilities; and

(3)  such other information as the public charitable organization or organizations deem necessary to compel proper administration of the trust.

